Illinois, session 104th, HB4267.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Township Code is amended by changing 5Sections 30-10 and 80-10 and by adding Section 55-70 as 6follows: 7    (60 ILCS 1/30-10)8    Sec. 30-10. Notice of meeting; agenda. 9    (a) Notice of the time and place of holding the annual and 10any special township meetings shall be given by the township 11clerk (or, in the clerk's absence, the supervisor, assessor, 12or collector) by posting written or printed notices in 3 of the 13most public places in the township at least 15 days before the 14meeting and, if there is an English language newspaper 15published in the township, by at least one publication in that 16newspaper before the meeting. The notice shall set forth the 17agenda for the meeting.18    A township that has a website that the full-time staff of 19the township maintains shall also post on its website the 20notice and agenda of the annual and any special township 21meetings. A notice and agenda of the annual or a special 22township meeting that is posted on a township's website shall 23remain posted on the website at least until the annual or   HB4267 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 14384 RTM 27520 b1special township meeting is concluded. 2    (b) Agenda. Not less than 15 days before the annual 3meeting, the township board shall adopt an agenda for the 4annual meeting. Any 15 or more registered voters in the 5township may request an agenda item for consideration by the 6electors at the annual meeting by giving written notice of a 7specific request to the township clerk no later than March 1 8prior to the annual meeting. The agenda published by the 9township board shall include any such request made by voters 10if the request is relevant to powers granted to electors under 11the Township Code.12    (c) Additional agenda items. Any matter or proposal not 13set forth in the published agenda shall not be considered at 14the annual meeting other than advising that the matter may be 15considered at a special meeting of the electors at a later 16date. 17    (d) Notice and agenda requirements for an annual township 18meeting that has been postponed under subsection (d) of 19Section 30-5 shall be the same as provided in this Section. 20(Source: P.A. 101-632, eff. 6-5-20.) 21    (60 ILCS 1/55-70 new)22    Sec. 55-70. Simultaneous service on school board. 23Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a supervisor or 24trustee of a township with fewer than 2,500 inhabitants may 25simultaneously serve as a member of a school board, as defined   HB4267 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 14384 RTM 27520 b1by Section 1-3 of the School Code, if otherwise qualified. 2    (60 ILCS 1/80-10)3    Sec. 80-10. Board meetings; township and road district 4accounts. 5    (a) The township board shall meet at the township clerk's 6office for the purpose of examining and auditing the township 7and road district accounts before any bills (other than 8general assistance, obligations for Social Security taxes as 9required by the Social Security Enabling Act, and wages that 10are subject to the Illinois Wage Payment and Collection Act, 11or other expenses determined by the township board by 12resolution) are paid, provided that payments made pursuant to 13a board resolution shall be reviewed and verified at the next 14meeting. The board may meet at other times as they determine. 15The township board may consider and approve bills individually 16or in a summary statement of any number of bills.17    (b) Upon the request of the supervisor or of any 2 board 18members, the township clerk shall call a meeting at the time 19requested and shall furnish to the board members at least 48 20hours' notice of the meeting.21    (c) The township board may declare a vacancy in the office 22of township supervisor or trustee if the supervisor or a 23trustee has 5 or more consecutive unexcused absences from 24regularly scheduled township board meetings.25    (d) The township board may adopt rules not inconsistent   HB4267 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 14384 RTM 27520 b1with this Code to govern its meetings. The rules may provide 2for excused absences of the supervisor or trustees from 3township board meetings.4    (e) All meetings of the township board shall be open to the 5public as provided in the Open Meetings Act.6    (f) Except as otherwise provided in Article 35, 3 members 7of the township board shall constitute a quorum for the 8transaction of business. The affirmative vote of 3 members of 9the township board is necessary to adopt any motion, 10resolution, or ordinance, unless a greater number is otherwise 11required by State law. 12(Source: P.A. 98-1174, eff. 1-12-15.) 13    Section 10. The Park District Code is amended by changing 14Section 8-10b as follows: 15    (70 ILCS 1205/8-10b)  (from Ch. 105, par. 8-10.2)16    Sec. 8-10b. Joint recreational programs for persons with 17disabilities. Any 2 or more park districts, or in counties 18with a population of 300,000 or less, a single park district 19and another unit of local government, are authorized to take 20any action jointly relating to recreational programs for 21persons with disabilities that could be taken individually and 22to enter into agreements with other park districts, townships, 23and recreation boards and the corporate authorities of cities, 24villages and incorporated towns specified in Sections 11-95-2   HB4267 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 14384 RTM 27520 b1and 11-95-3 of the "Illinois Municipal Code", approved May 29, 21961, as amended, or any combination thereof, for the purpose 3of providing for the establishment, maintenance and management 4of joint recreational programs for persons with disabilities 5of all the participating districts and municipal areas, 6including provisions for transportation of participants, 7procedures for approval of budgets, authorization of 8expenditures and sharing of expenses, location of recreational 9areas in the area of any of the participating districts and 10municipalities, acquisition of real estate by gift, legacy, 11grant, or purchase, employment of a director and other 12professional workers for such program who may be employed by 13one participating district, municipality or board which shall 14be reimbursed on a mutually agreed basis by the other 15districts, municipalities and boards that are parties to the 16joint agreement, authorization for one municipality, board or 17district to supply professional workers for a joint program 18conducted in another municipality or district and to provide 19other requirements for operation of such joint program as may 20be desirable.21(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)